District of Columbia statutes.
24-141

Reemployed annuitant Trustee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Federal or District of Columbia law applicable to a reemployed annuitant’s entitlement to retirement or pension benefits, The Director of the Office of Personnel Management may waive the provisions of § 8344 of title 5 of the United States Code for any reemployed annuitants appointed heretofore or hereafter as a Trustee under § 24-102 or § 24-132, or, at the request of such a Trustee, for any employee of such Trustee.

Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2190, Pub. L. 105-100, § 166
1981 Ed., § 24-1241.